Hawaii statutes.
§466-35 Peer review compliance
reporting form. (a) Upon the completion of a peer review, each reviewed
firm shall submit a peer review compliance reporting form to the board pursuant
to section 466-38. The peer review compliance reporting form shall include the
following:

(1) The name of the firm conducting the peer review;

(2) The name of the approved sponsoring organization;

(3) Except for public company accounting oversight
board inspections, the name of the team captain or peer reviewer or reviewers,
who shall not be affiliated with the firm being reviewed;

(4) The rating issued to the firm as a result of the
review, which shall be clearly indicated in the review report;

(5) The date of completion of the peer review; and

(6) A representation that the peer review or the
inspection by the public company accounting oversight board firm inspection
program includes the firm's Hawaii attest engagements within the scope of the
review or the inspection.

(b) A firm shall include, with the peer review
compliance reporting form, the contemporaneous Hawaii supplement to the peer
review report pursuant to section 466-36, if:

(1) A peer review report from an approved sponsoring
organization does not include the selection of a Hawaii office or Hawaii attest
engagement;

(2) The peer reviewer does not hold permits to
practice public accountancy under section 466-7 or is not licensed to practice
public accountancy in any other state, except inspectors for the public company
accounting oversight board; or

(3) The final report resulting from any inspection by
the public company accounting oversight board firm inspection program does not
include the firm's Hawaii offices, if any, and Hawaii attest engagements in the
scope of the inspection, and the firm is not required to enroll in another peer
review program under section 466-34. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1; am L 2016, c
145, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next